Vermont statutes. Title 15A Adoption Act
Subchapter 5. Petition to Terminate Relationship Between Parent and Child

§ 3-501.
Authorization.

A petition to terminate the relationship between a parent or an alleged parent and a minor child may be filed in a proceeding for adoption under this title by:

a parent or a guardian who has selected a prospective adoptive parent for a minor and who intends to place, or has placed, the minor with that person;

a parent whose spouse has filed a petition under Article 4 of this title to adopt the parent’s minor child;

a prospective adoptive parent of the minor who has filed a petition to adopt under this article or Article 4; or

an agency that has selected a prospective adoptive parent for the minor and intends to place, or has placed, the minor with that person.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-502.
Time and content of petition.

A petition under this part may be filed at any time before entry of a decree of adoption.

The petition shall be signed and verified by the petitioner, filed with the court, and state:

the name and address of the petitioner;

the name of the minor;

the name and last known address of the parent or alleged parent whose parental relationship the petitioner seeks to terminate;

the facts and circumstances forming the basis for the petition and the grounds on which termination of a parental relationship is sought;

if the petitioner is a prospective adoptive parent, that the petitioner intends to proceed with the petition to adopt the minor if the petition to terminate is granted; and

if the petitioner is a parent, a guardian, or an agency, that the petitioner has placed or intends to place the minor for adoption.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-503.
Service of petition and notice.

A petition to terminate under this part and a notice of hearing on the petition shall be served upon the respondent in the manner prescribed in section 3-403 of this title.

The notice of a hearing shall inform the respondent of the method for responding and that:

the respondent has a right to be represented by an attorney and may be entitled to have an attorney appointed by the court; and

if the respondent fails to respond within 20 days after service and, in the case of an alleged father, fails to file a claim of paternity within 20 days after service unless a claim of paternity is pending, the respondent may not appear in or receive further notice of the proceeding for adoption or termination and that the failure to respond will result in termination of the relationship of parent and child between the respondent and the minor unless the proceeding for adoption is dismissed.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-504.
Grounds for terminating relationship of parent and child.

If a respondent answers or appears at the hearing and asserts parental rights, the court shall proceed with the hearing expeditiously. If the court finds, upon clear and convincing evidence, that any one of the following grounds exists and that termination is in the best interests of the minor, the court shall order the termination of any parental relationship of the respondent to the minor:

In the case of a minor under six months of age at the time the petition is filed, the respondent did not exercise parental responsibility once he or she knew or should have known of the minor’s birth or expected birth. In making a determination under this subdivision, the court shall consider all relevant factors, which may include the respondent’s failure to:

pay reasonable prenatal, natal, and postnatal expenses in accordance with his or her financial means;

make reasonable and consistent payments, in accordance with his or her financial means, for the support of the minor;

regularly communicate or visit with the minor; or

manifest an ability and willingness to assume legal and physical custody of the minor.

In the case of a minor over six months of age at the time the petition is filed, the respondent did not exercise parental responsibility for a period of at least six months immediately preceding the filing of the petition. In making a determination under this subdivision, the court shall consider all relevant factors, which may include the respondent’s failure to:

make reasonable and consistent payments, in accordance with his or her financial means, for the support of the minor, although legally obligated to do so;

regularly communicate or visit with the minor; or

during any time the minor was not in the physical custody of the other parent, manifest an ability and willingness to assume legal and physical custody of the minor.

The respondent has been convicted of a crime of violence or has been found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have committed an act of violence that violated a restraining or protective order, and the facts of the crime or violation indicate that the respondent is unfit to maintain a relationship of parent and child with the minor.

The respondent has committed a sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child.

If the respondent has proved by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she had good cause for not complying with subdivision (a)(1) or (2) of this section or that, for compelling reasons, termination is not justified under subdivision (a)(3) or (4) of this section, the court may not terminate the respondent’s parental rights to a minor except upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that any one of the following grounds exists and that termination is in the best interests of the minor:

Once the respondent no longer had good cause for not complying with the requirements of subdivision (a)(1) or (2) of this section, he or she failed to assume parental responsibilities as promptly and fully as circumstances permitted.

The respondent, after being afforded a reasonable opportunity to do so, would not have the ability and disposition to:

provide the child with love, affection, and guidance;

meet the child’s present and future physical and emotional needs; or

provide the child with adequate food, clothing, medical care, other material needs, education, and a safe environment.

At the time of the hearing, the respondent has a relationship with another person who would significantly and adversely affect the child.

Placing the minor in the respondent’s legal or physical custody would pose a risk of substantial harm to the physical or psychological well-being of the minor because the circumstances of the minor’s conception, or the respondent’s behavior during the pregnancy, or since the minor’s birth indicates that he or she is unfit to maintain a relationship of parent and child with the minor.

At the time of the hearing under this section, the court shall consider the best interests of the child in accordance with the following criteria:

the likelihood that the respondent will be able to assume or resume his or her parental duties within a reasonable period of time;

the child’s adjustment to his or her home, school, and community;

the interaction and interrelationship of the child with his or her parents, siblings, and any other person who may significantly affect the best interests of the child; and

whether the parent or alleged parent has played and continues to play a constructive role, including personal contact and demonstrated love and affection, in the child’s welfare.

If the respondent does not answer or appear or, in the case of an alleged father, file a claim of paternity as provided in subdivision 3-503(b)(2) of this title, or cannot be notified because the person’s identity or whereabouts is unknown, the court may order the termination of any parental relationship to the minor.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 3-505.
Effect of order granting petition.

An order issued under this part granting the petition:

terminates the relationship of parent and child between the respondent and the minor;

extinguishes any right the respondent had to withhold consent to a proposed adoption of the minor or to further notice of a proceeding for adoption; and

is a final order for purposes of appeal.

An order issued under this part granting the petition shall not terminate an obligation for arrearages of child support.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-506.
Effect of order denying petition.

If the court fails to find a ground stated in section 3-504 of this title for terminating a relationship of parent and child, the court shall deny the petition to terminate and enter an order as follows:

if the parent who was not the subject of the petition executed a consent or relinquishment contingent upon termination of the other parent’s relationship of parent and child, the court shall set aside the consent or relinquishment and make an order determining the temporary physical custody of the child pursuant to sections 2-408 and 2-409 of this title; or

if the parent’s consent or relinquishment was not contingent, shall terminate the adoption proceeding and grant legal and physical custody of the minor to the parent who was the subject of the petition, unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the prospective adoptive parent has been the primary care provider of the child for such a period of time that the harm to the child occasioned by a change in custody would likely be greater than the harm occasioned by not being parented by the parent who was the subject of the petition. In making this determination, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that it is in the best interests of the minor to be parented by the parent. Under such circumstances and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court may make a visitation order as provided in section 4-112 of this title.

An order issued under this part denying a petition to terminate a relationship of parent and child is a final order for purposes of appeal.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.